Oklahoma, session 2026, SB509.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. REPEALER 70 O.S. 2021, Section 4427, is


hereby repealed.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-549 EB 1/19/2025 5:37:45 AM







Req. No. 549 Page 1